HunspellVBATests/lang/tk-TM.aff
FLAG num
SFX 5993 un nuşymyzda .
SFX 5993 ur ruşymyzda .
SFX 5993 us suşymyzda .
SFX 5993 uş şuşymyzda .
SFX 5993 uz zuşymyzdan .
SFX 5993 ul luşymyzdan .
SFX 5993 un nuşymyzdan .
SFX 5993 ur ruşymyzdan .
SFX 5993 us suşymyzdan .
SFX 5993 uş şuşymyzdan .
SFX 5993 uz zuşyňyz .
SFX 5993 ul luşyňyz .
SFX 5993 un nuşyňyz .
SFX 5993 ur ruşyňyz .
SFX 5993 us suşyňyz .
SFX 5993 uş şuşyňyz .
SFX 5993 uz zuşyňyzyň .
SFX 5993 ul luşyňyzyň .
SFX 5993 un nuşyňyzyň .
SFX 5993 ur ruşyňyzyň .
SFX 5993 us suşyňyzyň .
SFX 5993 uş şuşyňyzyň .
SFX 5993 uz zuşyňyza .
SFX 5993 ul luşyňyza .
SFX 5993 un nuşyňyza .
SFX 5993 ur ruşyňyza .
SFX 5993 us suşyňyza .
SFX 5993 uş şuşyňyza .
SFX 5993 uz zuşyňyzy .
SFX 5993 ul luşyňyzy .
SFX 5993 un nuşyňyzy .
SFX 5993 ur ruşyňyzy .
SFX 5993 us suşyňyzy .
SFX 5993 uş şuşyňyzy .
SFX 5993 uz zuşyňyzda .
SFX 5993 ul luşyňyzda .
SFX 5993 un nuşyňyzda .
SFX 5993 ur ruşyňyzda .
SFX 5993 us suşyňyzda .
SFX 5993 uş şuşyňyzda .
SFX 5993 uz zuşyňyzdan .
SFX 5993 ul luşyňyzdan .
SFX 5993 un nuşyňyzdan .
SFX 5993 ur ruşyňyzdan .
SFX 5993 us suşyňyzdan .
SFX 5993 uş şuşyňyzdan .
SFX 5993 uz zuşlary .
SFX 5993 ul luşlary .
SFX 5993 un nuşlary .
SFX 5993 ur ruşlary .
SFX 5993 us suşlary .
SFX 5993 uş şuşlary .
SFX 5993 uz zuşlarynyň .
SFX 5993 ul luşlarynyň .
SFX 5993 un nuşlarynyň .
SFX 5993 ur ruşlarynyň .
SFX 5993 us suşlarynyň .
SFX 5993 uş şuşlarynyň .
SFX 5993 uz zuşlaryna .
SFX 5993 ul luşlaryna .
SFX 5993 un nuşlaryna .
SFX 5993 ur ruşlaryna .
SFX 5993 us suşlaryna .
SFX 5993 uş şuşlaryna .
SFX 5993 uz zuşlaryny .
SFX 5993 ul luşlaryny .
SFX 5993 un nuşlaryny .
SFX 5993 ur ruşlaryny .
SFX 5993 us suşlaryny .
SFX 5993 uş şuşlaryny .
SFX 5993 uz zuşlarynda .
SFX 5993 ul luşlarynda .
SFX 5993 un nuşlarynda .
SFX 5993 ur ruşlarynda .
SFX 5993 us suşlarynda .
SFX 5993 uş şuşlarynda .
SFX 5993 uz zuşlaryndan .
SFX 5993 ul luşlaryndan .
SFX 5993 un nuşlaryndan .
SFX 5993 ur ruşlaryndan .
SFX 5993 us suşlaryndan .
SFX 5993 uş şuşlaryndan .
SFX 5993 uz zubilsem .
SFX 5993 ul lubilsem .
SFX 5993 un nubilsem .
SFX 5993 ur rubilsem .
SFX 5993 us subilsem .
SFX 5993 uş şubilsem .
SFX 5993 0 mabilsem .
SFX 5993 uz zubilseň .
SFX 5993 ul lubilseň .
SFX 5993 un nubilseň .
SFX 5993 ur rubilseň .
SFX 5993 us subilseň .
SFX 5993 uş şubilseň .
SFX 5993 0 mabilseň .
SFX 5993 uz zubilse .
SFX 5993 ul lubilse .
SFX 5993 un nubilse .
SFX 5993 ur rubilse .
SFX 5993 us subilse .
SFX 5993 uş şubilse .
SFX 5993 0 mabilse .
SFX 5993 uz zubilsek .
SFX 5993 ul lubilsek .
SFX 5993 un nubilsek .
SFX 5993 ur rubilsek .
SFX 5993 us subilsek .
SFX 5993 uş şubilsek .
SFX 5993 0 mabilsek .
SFX 5993 uz zubilseňiz .
SFX 5993 ul lubilseňiz .
SFX 5993 un nubilseňiz .
SFX 5993 ur rubilseňiz .
SFX 5993 us subilseňiz .
SFX 5993 uş şubilseňiz .
SFX 5993 0 mabilseňiz .
SFX 5993 uz zubilseler .
SFX 5993 ul lubilseler .
SFX 5993 un nubilseler .
SFX 5993 ur rubilseler .
SFX 5993 us subilseler .
SFX 5993 uş şubilseler .
SFX 5993 0 mabilseler .
SFX 5993 uz zandyr .
SFX 5993 ul landyr .
SFX 5993 un nandyr .
SFX 5993 ur randyr .
SFX 5993 us sandyr .
SFX 5993 uş şandyr .
SFX 5993 0 nyň .
SFX 5993 0 madygyň .
SFX 5993 0 ýanyň .
SFX 5993 0 maýanyň .
SFX 5993 0 jagyň .
SFX 5993 0 majagyň .
SFX 5993 uz zandygym .
SFX 5993 ul landygym .
SFX 5993 un nandygym .
SFX 5993 ur randygym .
SFX 5993 us sandygym .
SFX 5993 uş şandygym .
SFX 5993 uz zandygymyň .
SFX 5993 ul landygymyň .
SFX 5993 un nandygymyň .
SFX 5993 ur randygymyň .
SFX 5993 us sandygymyň .
SFX 5993 uş şandygymyň .
SFX 5993 uz zandygyma .
SFX 5993 ul landygyma .
SFX 5993 un nandygyma .
SFX 5993 ur randygyma .
SFX 5993 us sandygyma .
SFX 5993 uş şandygyma .
SFX 5993 uz zandygymy .
SFX 5993 ul landygymy .
SFX 5993 un nandygymy .
SFX 5993 ur randygymy .
SFX 5993 us sandygymy .
SFX 5993 uş şandygymy .
SFX 5993 uz zandygymda .
SFX 5993 ul landygymda .
SFX 5993 un nandygymda .
SFX 5993 ur randygymda .
SFX 5993 us sandygymda .
SFX 5993 uş şandygymda .
SFX 5993 uz zandygymdan .
SFX 5993 ul landygymdan .
SFX 5993 un nandygymdan .
SFX 5993 ur randygymdan .
SFX 5993 us sandygymdan .
SFX 5993 uş şandygymdan .
SFX 5993 uz zandygyň .
SFX 5993 ul landygyň .
SFX 5993 un nandygyň .
SFX 5993 ur randygyň .
SFX 5993 us sandygyň .
SFX 5993 uş şandygyň .
SFX 5993 uz zandygyňyň .
SFX 5993 ul landygyňyň .
SFX 5993 un nandygyňyň .
SFX 5993 ur randygyňyň .
SFX 5993 us sandygyňyň .
SFX 5993 uş şandygyňyň .
SFX 5993 uz zandygyňa .
SFX 5993 ul landygyňa .
SFX 5993 un nandygyňa .
SFX 5993 ur randygyňa .
SFX 5993 us sandygyňa .
SFX 5993 uş şandygyňa .
SFX 5993 uz zandygyňy .
SFX 5993 ul landygyňy .
SFX 5993 un nandygyňy .
SFX 5993 ur randygyňy .
SFX 5993 us sandygyňy .
SFX 5993 uş şandygyňy .
SFX 5993 uz zandygyňda .
SFX 5993 ul landygyňda .
SFX 5993 un nandygyňda .
SFX 5993 ur randygyňda .
SFX 5993 us sandygyňda .
SFX 5993 uş şandygyňda .
SFX 5993 uz zandygyňdan .
SFX 5993 ul landygyňdan .
SFX 5993 un nandygyňdan .
SFX 5993 ur randygyňdan .
SFX 5993 us sandygyňdan .
SFX 5993 uş şandygyňdan .
SFX 5993 uz zandygy .
SFX 5993 ul landygy .
SFX 5993 un nandygy .
SFX 5993 ur randygy .
SFX 5993 us sandygy .
SFX 5993 uş şandygy .
SFX 5993 uz zandygynyň .
SFX 5993 ul landygynyň .
SFX 5993 un nandygynyň .
SFX 5993 ur randygynyň .
SFX 5993 us sandygynyň .
SFX 5993 uş şandygynyň .
SFX 5993 uz zandygyna .
SFX 5993 ul landygyna .
SFX 5993 un nandygyna .
SFX 5993 ur randygyna .
SFX 5993 us sandygyna .
SFX 5993 uş şandygyna .
SFX 5993 uz zandygyny .
SFX 5993 ul landygyny .
SFX 5993 un nandygyny .
SFX 5993 ur randygyny .
SFX 5993 us sandygyny .
SFX 5993 uş şandygyny .
SFX 5993 uz zandygynda .
SFX 5993 ul landygynda .
SFX 5993 un nandygynda .
SFX 5993 ur randygynda .
SFX 5993 us sandygynda .
SFX 5993 uş şandygynda .
SFX 5993 uz zandygyndan .
SFX 5993 ul landygyndan .
SFX 5993 un nandygyndan .
SFX 5993 ur randygyndan .
SFX 5993 us sandygyndan .
SFX 5993 uş şandygyndan .
SFX 5993 uz zandygymyz .
SFX 5993 ul landygymyz .
SFX 5993 un nandygymyz .
SFX 5993 ur randygymyz .
SFX 5993 us sandygymyz .
SFX 5993 uş şandygymyz .
SFX 5993 uz zandygymyzyň .
SFX 5993 ul landygymyzyň .
SFX 5993 un nandygymyzyň .
SFX 5993 ur randygymyzyň .
SFX 5993 us sandygymyzyň .
SFX 5993 uş şandygymyzyň .
SFX 5993 uz zandygymyza .
SFX 5993 ul landygymyza .
SFX 5993 un nandygymyza .
SFX 5993 ur randygymyza .
SFX 5993 us sandygymyza .
SFX 5993 uş şandygymyza .
SFX 5993 uz zandygymyzy .
SFX 5993 ul landygymyzy .
SFX 5993 un nandygymyzy .
SFX 5993 ur randygymyzy .
SFX 5993 us sandygymyzy .
SFX 5993 uş şandygymyzy .
SFX 5993 uz zandygymyzda .
SFX 5993 ul landygymyzda .
SFX 5993 un nandygymyzda .
SFX 5993 ur randygymyzda .
SFX 5993 us sandygymyzda .
SFX 5993 uş şandygymyzda .
SFX 5993 uz zandygymyzdan .
SFX 5993 ul landygymyzdan .
SFX 5993 un nandygymyzdan .
SFX 5993 ur randygymyzdan .
SFX 5993 us sandygymyzdan .
SFX 5993 uş şandygymyzdan .
SFX 5993 uz zandygyňyz .
SFX 5993 ul landygyňyz .
SFX 5993 un nandygyňyz .
SFX 5993 ur randygyňyz .
SFX 5993 us sandygyňyz .
SFX 5993 uş şandygyňyz .
SFX 5993 uz zandygyňyzyň .
SFX 5993 ul landygyňyzyň .
SFX 5993 un nandygyňyzyň .
SFX 5993 ur randygyňyzyň .
SFX 5993 us sandygyňyzyň .
SFX 5993 uş şandygyňyzyň .
SFX 5993 uz zandygyňyza .
SFX 5993 ul landygyňyza .
SFX 5993 un nandygyňyza .
SFX 5993 ur randygyňyza .
SFX 5993 us sandygyňyza .
SFX 5993 uş şandygyňyza .
SFX 5993 uz zandygyňyzy .
SFX 5993 ul landygyňyzy .
SFX 5993 un nandygyňyzy .
SFX 5993 ur randygyňyzy .
SFX 5993 us sandygyňyzy .
SFX 5993 uş şandygyňyzy .
SFX 5993 uz zandygyňyzda .
SFX 5993 ul landygyňyzda .
SFX 5993 un nandygyňyzda .
SFX 5993 ur randygyňyzda .
SFX 5993 us sandygyňyzda .
SFX 5993 uş şandygyňyzda .
SFX 5993 uz zandygyňyzdan .
SFX 5993 ul landygyňyzdan .
SFX 5993 un nandygyňyzdan .
SFX 5993 ur randygyňyzdan .
SFX 5993 us sandygyňyzdan .
SFX 5993 uş şandygyňyzdan .
SFX 5993 uz zandyklary .
SFX 5993 ul landyklary .
SFX 5993 un nandyklary .
SFX 5993 ur randyklary .
SFX 5993 us sandyklary .
SFX 5993 uş şandyklary .
SFX 5993 uz zandyklarynyň .
SFX 5993 ul landyklarynyň .
SFX 5993 un nandyklarynyň .
