HunspellVBATests/lang/tk-TM.dic
bogul/5993
boguş/5993
bozul/5993
burul/5993
buýur/5993
dogul/5993
dogur/5993
doýur/5993
durul/5993
duruş/5993
duruz/5993
duýul/5993
gorul/5993
gowur/5993
gowuş/5993
goýul/5993
goýuş/5993
gurul/5993
gurun/5993
guruş/5993
guýul/5993
guýun/5993
guýuş/5993
jomur/5993
kowul/5993
kowuş/5993
omur/5993
oňur/5993
oňuş/5993
orul/5993
oruş/5993
owul/5993
owuş/5993
sogur/5993
sowul/5993
sowur/5993
sowuş/5993
soýul/5993
towus/5993
turuş/5993
turuz/5993
urul/5993
urun/5993
uruş/5993
uýul/5993
ýolun/5993
ýoluş/5993
ýorul/5993
ýugur/5993
ýumul/5993
ýumur/5993
ýuwul/5993
ýuwun/5993
ýuwuş/5993
